District of Columbia statutes.
7-2361.09

Regulatory authority.

(a)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

(b)

In issuing rules under subsection (a) of this section, the Mayor shall consult with and consider the recommendations of the entities established to coordinate the implementation of the Emergency Management Assistance Compact in the District and in other states to promote uniformity of application of this chapter and make the emergency response systems in the various states reasonably compatible.

July 1, 2010, D.C. Law 18-184, § 10, 57 DCR 3655
This section is referenced in § 7-2361.06.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 10 of the Uniform Emergency Volunteer Health Practitioners Act.